Utah statutes.
77-24-1.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Intangible property" means:

(a)  money, checks, drafts, deposits, interest, dividends, and income;

(b)  credit balances, customer overpayments, gift certificates, security deposits, refunds, credit memos, unpaid wages, unused airline tickets, and unidentified remittances;

(c)  stocks and other intangible ownership interests in business associations;

(d)  money deposited to redeem stocks, bonds, coupons, and other securities or to make distributions;

(e)  amounts due and payable under the terms of insurance policies; and

(f)  amounts distributable from a trust or custodial fund established under a plan to provide health, welfare, pension, vacation, severance, retirement, death, stock purchase, profit sharing, employee savings, supplemental unemployment insurance, or similar benefits.

(2)  "Property" means any tangible or intangible property that is not seized for forfeiture pursuant to Title 24, Chapter 1, Utah Uniform Forfeiture Procedures Act, that:

(a)  comes into the possession of a peace officer through execution of a search warrant;

(b)  comes into the possession of a peace officer pursuant to an arrest of a person, with or without a warrant;

(c)  is received or taken as evidence in connection with any public offense; or

(d)  comes into the possession of a municipal or county animal control officer.

(3)  "Tangible property" means all property that is not intangible property.

